Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-128] Nondiscrimination. Continuing
education courses provided by insurers to insurance producers shall be subject
to the same standards, reviews, and credits as other continuing education
courses. Nothing in this article is intended to preclude the provision of
continuing education courses by insurers to insurance producers; provided that
no credit shall be given for any course unless it is a continuing education
course approved by the commissioner. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next